District of Columbia statutes.
29-603.04

Statement of denial.

A partner or other person named as a partner in a filed statement of partnership authority or in a list maintained by an agent pursuant to § 29-603.03(b) may deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of denial stating the name of the partnership and the fact that is being denied, which may include denial of a person’s authority or status as a partner. A statement of denial shall be a limitation on authority as provided in § 29-603.03(d) and (e).

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(3)(B), 59 DCR 13171

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 33-103.04.
1981 Ed., § 41-153.4.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “deliver to the Mayor for filing” for “file.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 304 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.